Maryland, session 2025, SB0387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–309.
ON REQUEST OF THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND
SECURITY, A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY WITH CUSTODY OF AN
UNDOCUMENTED IMMIGRANT WHO IS SERVING A SENTENCE IN THE FACILITY FOR
CONVICTION OF A CRIME SHALL TRANSFER THE INDIVIDUAL TO THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(1) HAS ENGAGED IN OR IS SUSPECTED OF TERRORISM OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0387*

SENATE BILL 387
ESPIONAGE, OR OTHERWISE POSES A DANGER TO NATIONAL SECURITY;
(2) HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF AN OFFENSE OF WHICH AN ELEMENT IS
ACTIVE PARTICIPATION IN A CRIMINAL STREET GANG, AS DEFINED IN 18 U.S.C. §
521;
(3) IS AT LEAST 16 YEARS OLD AND INTENTIONALLY PARTICIPATED
IN A CRIMINAL STREET GANG, AS DEFINED IN 18 U.S.C. § 521, TO FURTHER ILLEGAL
ACTIVITIES; OR
(4) HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF AN AGGRAVATED FELONY, AS DEFINED
IN 8 U.S.C. § 1101.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.